Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-222
Inspectors and judges and clerks of election; oath.

Before entering upon his or her duties, each judge of election, clerk of election, and inspector shall take and subscribe an oath and file the same with the election commissioner. The oath need not be taken and signed before a person authorized to administer oaths. If the oath is printed in the sign-in register, the signing of the sign-in register by such judges, clerks, and inspectors shall be a complete and sufficient compliance with the requirements of section 11-101.01. The form of the oath shall be as provided in such section.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 42;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 20.